Washington statutes.
RCW 20.01.400

Broker's memorandum of sale.

Every broker, upon negotiating the sale of agricultural products, shall issue to both buyer and seller a written memorandum of sale, showing price, date of delivery, quality, and other details concerned in the transaction. A copy of this memorandum shall be retained by the broker for a period of one year.

[ 1959 c 139 s 40.]